Washington statutes.
RCW 7.07.060

Prohibited mediator reports.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a mediator may not make a report, assessment, evaluation, recommendation, finding, or other communication regarding a mediation to a court, administrative agency, or other authority that may make a ruling on the dispute that is the subject of the mediation.

(2) A mediator may disclose:

(a) Whether the mediation occurred or has terminated, whether a settlement was reached, attendance, and efforts to schedule a mediation ordered by a court, administrative agency, or other authority that may make a ruling on the dispute;

(b) A mediation communication as permitted under RCW 7.07.050; or

(c) A mediation communication evidencing abuse, neglect, abandonment, or exploitation of an individual to a public agency responsible for protecting individuals against such mistreatment.

(3) A communication made in violation of subsection (1) of this section may not be considered by a court, administrative agency, or arbitrator.

[ 2005 c 172 s 7.]